Mississippi statutes. Title 63. Motor Vehicles and Traffic Regulations
Vehicles, Equipment and the Like Defined

§ 63-3-103.
Vehicles.

“Vehicle” means every device in, upon or by which any person or property is or may be transported or drawn upon a highway, except devices used exclusively upon stationary rails or tracks.

“Motor vehicle” means every vehicle which is self-propelled and every vehicle which is propelled by electric power obtained from overhead trolley wires, but not operated upon rails. The term “motor vehicle” shall not include electric personal assistive mobility devices.

“Motorcycle” means every motor vehicle having a saddle for the use of the rider and designed to travel on not more than three (3) wheels in contact with the ground but excluding a tractor. The term “motorcycle” includes motor scooters as defined in paragraph (j) of this subsection.

“Authorized emergency vehicle” means every vehicle of the fire department (fire patrol), every police vehicle, every 911 Emergency Communications District vehicle, every such ambulance and special use EMS vehicle as defined in Section 41-59-3, every Mississippi Emergency Management Agency vehicle as is designated or authorized by the Executive Director of MEMA and every emergency vehicle of municipal departments or public service corporations as is designated or authorized by the commission or the chief of police of an incorporated city.

“School bus” means every motor vehicle operated for the transportation of children to or from any school, provided same is plainly marked “School Bus” on the front and rear thereof and meets the requirements of the State Board of Education as authorized under Section 37-41-1.

“Recreational vehicle” means a vehicular type unit primarily designed as temporary living quarters for recreational, camping or travel use, which either has its own motive power or is mounted on or drawn by another vehicle and includes travel trailers, fifth-wheel trailers, camping trailers, truck campers and motor homes.

“Motor home” means a motor vehicle that is designed and constructed primarily to provide temporary living quarters for recreational, camping or travel use.

“Electric assistive mobility device” means a self-balancing two-tandem wheeled device, designed to transport only one (1) person, with an electric propulsion system that limits the maximum speed of the device to fifteen (15) miles per hour.

“Autocycle” means a three-wheel motorcycle with a steering wheel, nonstraddle seating, rollover protection and seat belts.

“Motor scooter” means a two-wheeled vehicle that has a seat for the operator, one (1) wheel that is ten (10) inches or more in diameter, a step-through chassis, a motor with a rating of two and seven-tenths (2.7) brake horsepower or less if the motor is an internal combustion engine, an engine of 50cc or less and otherwise meets all safety requirements of motorcycles.

“Platoon” means a group of individual motor vehicles traveling in a unified manner at electronically coordinated speeds at following distances that are closer than would be reasonable and prudent without such coordination.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8127; Laws, 1938, ch. 200; Laws, 1973, ch. 338, § 1; Laws, 1976, ch. 348; Laws, 1980, ch. 316, § 2; Laws, 1983, ch. 350, § 1; Laws, 1986, ch. 459, § 35; Laws, 2000, ch. 318, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 485, § 9; Laws, 2004, ch. 425, § 3; Laws, 2012, ch. 452, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 406, § 1; Laws, 2015, ch. 464, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2015; Laws, 2018, ch. 304, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2018; Laws, 2018, ch. 445, § 1, eff from and after January 1, 2019.

§ 63-3-105.
Tractors.

“Farm tractor” means every motor vehicle designed and used primarily as a farm implement for drawing plows, mowing machines, and other implements of husbandry.

“Road tractor” means every motor vehicle designed and used for drawing other vehicles and not so constructed as to carry any load thereon either independently or any part of the weight of a vehicle or load so drawn.

“Truck tractor” means every motor vehicle designed and used primarily for drawing other vehicles and not so constructed as to carry a load other than a part of the weight of the vehicle and load so drawn.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8128; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-107.
Trailers.

“Trailer” means every vehicle without motive power designed for carrying persons or property and for being drawn by a motor vehicle and so constructed that no part of its weight rests upon the towing vehicle.

“Semitrailer” means every vehicle without motive power designed for carrying persons or property and for being drawn by a motor vehicle and so constructed that some part of its weight and that of its load rests upon or is carried by another vehicle.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8129; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-109.
Railroads.

“Railroad” means a carrier of persons or property upon cars, other than street cars, operated upon stationary rails.

“Railroad train” means a steam engine, electric or other motor, with or without cars coupled thereto, operated upon rails, except street cars.

“Street car” means a car other than a railroad train for transporting persons or property and operated upon rails principally within a municipality.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8131; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-111.
Tires.

“Metal tire” means every tire the surface of which in contact with the highway is wholly or partly of metal or other hard nonresilient material.

“Pneumatic tire” means every tire in which compressed air is designed to support the load.

“Solid tire” means every tire of rubber or other resilient material which does not depend upon compressed air for the support of the load.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8130; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.

§ 63-3-113.
Explosives and flammable liquids.

“Explosive” means any chemical compound or mechanical mixture that is commonly used or intended for the purpose of producing an explosion and which contains any oxidizing and combustive units or other ingredients in such proportions, quantities or packing that an ignition by fire, by friction, by concussion, by percussion, or by detonator of any part of the compound or mixture may cause such a sudden generation of highly heated gases that the resultant gaseous pressures are capable of producing destructible effects on contiguous objects or of destroying life or limb.

“Flammable liquid” means any liquid which has a flash point of 70 degrees F., or less, as determined by a tagliabue or equivalent closed cup test device.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 8132; Laws, 1938, ch. 200.